Utah statutes.
48-1-.5.   Scope of chapter.

Until this chapter is repealed January 1, 2016, this chapter applies only to a partnership formed on or before December 31, 2013, that has not elected to be governed by Chapter 1d, Utah Uniform Partnership Act, as provided in Section 48-1d-1405.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

